Vermont, session 2025-2026, H321.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 7 V.S.A. § 832 is amended to read:
§ 832. CANNABIS POSSESSED UNLAWFULLY SUBJECT TO SEIZURE
AND FORFEITURE
Cannabis possessed unlawfully in violation of this title or administrative
rules adopted pursuant to this title may be seized by law enforcement and is
subject to forfeiture.
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 844 is amended to read:
§ 844. AUTHORITY FOR CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECKS
(a) The Board shall establish a user agreement with the Vermont Crime
Information Center in accordance with 20 V.S.A. chapter 117 for the purpose
of obtaining Vermont criminal history records, out-of-state criminal history
records, and criminal history records from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
as required by chapters 33 (cannabis establishments) and 37 (medical cannabis
dispensaries) of this title.
(b) A fingerprint-based state and national criminal history record check
shall be conducted for each natural person prior to being issued a cannabis
establishment identification card pursuant to chapter 33 (cannabis
establishments) of this title or a medical cannabis dispensary identification
card pursuant to chapter 37 (medical cannabis dispensaries) of this title. The
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 2 of 13
2025
Board may require that such record checks be completed as a condition
precedent to license renewal.
Sec. 2a. [Deleted.]
Sec. 2b. 10 V.S.A. § 325u is amended to read:
§ 325u. VERMONT LAND ACCESS AND OPPORTUNITY BOARD
* * *
(b) Organization of Board. The Board shall be composed of:
* * *
(10) one member, appointed by the Vermont Developmental Disabilities
Council; and
(11) one member, appointed by Vermont Psychiatric Survivors; and
(12) one member, appointed by Migrant Justice.
* * *
Sec. 3. 7 V.S.A. § 861(23) is amended to read:
(23)(A) “Hemp products” or “hemp-infused products” means all
products with the federally defined tetrahydrocannabinol concentration level
for hemp derived from, or made by, processing hemp plants or plant parts that
are prepared in a form available for commercial sale, including cosmetics,
personal care products, food intended for animal or human consumption, cloth,
cordage, fiber, fuel, paint, paper, construction materials, plastics, and any
product containing one or more hemp-derived cannabinoids, such as
cannabidiol.
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 3 of 13
2025
(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (A) of this subdivision (23), “hemp
products” and “hemp-infused products” do not include any substance,
manufacturing intermediary, or product that:
(i) is prohibited or deemed a regulated cannabis product by
administrative rule of the Cannabis Control Board; or
(ii) contains more than 0.3 percent total tetrahydrocannabinol on a
dry-weight basis.
(C) A hemp-derived product or substance that is excluded from the
definition of “hemp products” or “hemp-infused products” pursuant to
subdivision (B) of this subdivision (23) shall be considered a cannabis product
as defined by subdivision 831(3) of this title; provided, however, that a person
duly licensed or registered by the Cannabis Control Board lawfully may
possess such products in conformity with the person’s license or hemp
processor registration.
Sec. 4. [Deleted.]
Sec. 5. 7 V.S.A. § 883 is amended to read:
§ 883. CRIMINAL BACKGROUND RECORD CHECKS; APPLICANTS
(a) The Board shall obtain from the Vermont Crime Information Center a
copy of a fingerprint-based Vermont criminal history records, out-of-state
criminal history records, and criminal history records from the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for each license applicant, principal of an applicant, and
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 4 of 13
2025
person who controls an applicant who is a natural person. Checks may be
repeated for good cause or with prudent frequency as determined by the Board.
(b) The Board shall adopt rules that set forth standards for determining
whether an applicant should be denied a cannabis establishment license
because of his or her the applicant’s criminal history record based on factors
that demonstrate whether the applicant presently poses a threat to public safety
or the proper functioning of the regulated market. Nonviolent drug offenses
shall not automatically disqualify an applicant.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section or subsection 844(b) of
this title, if required records are not reasonably available to the Board due to
circumstances beyond its control, with the consent of the applicant, the Board
may accept third-party criminal background checks submitted by an applicant
for a cannabis establishment license or renewal in lieu of obtaining the records
from the Vermont Crime Information Center a copy of the person’s Vermont
fingerprint-based criminal history records, out-of-state criminal history
records, and criminal history records from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
from a reputable commercial provider. Any such third-party background
check shall:
(1) be conducted by a third-party consumer reporting agency or
background screening company that is in compliance with the federal Fair
Credit Reporting Act; and
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 5 of 13
2025
(2) include a multistate and multi-jurisdiction multijurisdiction criminal
record locator. Consumer credit scores shall not be a basis for license denial.
Sec. 6. 7 V.S.A. § 884 is amended to read:
§ 884. CANNABIS ESTABLISHMENT IDENTIFICATION CARD
(a) Every owner, principal, and employee of a cannabis establishment shall
obtain an identification card issued by the Board. A person may apply for an
identification card prior to obtaining employment with a licensee. An
employee identification card shall authorize the person to work for any
licensee.
(b)(1)(A) Prior to issuing the identification card to an owner or principal of
a cannabis establishment, the Board shall obtain from the Vermont Crime
Information Center a copy of the person’s Vermont fingerprint-based criminal
history records, out-of-state criminal history records, and criminal history
records from the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(B) Prior to issuing the identification card to an employee of a
cannabis establishment, the Board shall obtain a copy of a fingerprint-based
identity history summary record from the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(2) The Board shall adopt rules that set forth standards for determining
whether a person should be denied a cannabis establishment identification card
because of his or her the person’s criminal history record based on factors that
demonstrate whether the applicant presently poses a threat to public safety or
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 6 of 13
2025
the proper functioning of the regulated market. Nonviolent drug offenses shall
not automatically disqualify an applicant.
(c) Once an identification card application has been submitted, a person the
Board, for good cause, may serve issue a temporary permit authorizing the
applicant to serve as an employee of a cannabis establishment pending the
background check, provided the person is supervised in his or her duties by
someone who is a cardholder. The Board shall issue a temporary permit to the
person for this purpose, which shall expire upon the issuance of the
identification card or disqualification of the person in accordance with this
section Good cause exists if, among other reasons, the application is
reasonably expected to take more than 12 days to process.
(d) An identification card shall expire one year after its issuance or, in the
case of owners and principals, upon the expiration of the cannabis
establishment’s license, whichever occurs first.
Sec. 7. 7 V.S.A. § 886 is added to read:
§ 886. INCAPACITY OR DISTRESS; SPECIAL PERMITTING;
IMMUNITY
(a) It is the purpose of this section to authorize the Board to effectively
oversee cannabis establishments and the persons authorized to operate such
establishments in case of incapacity of a principal, dysfunction, operating
distress, interruption in licensure, abrupt closure, or judicial intervention
including receivership.
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 7 of 13
2025
(b) The Board may issue a special permit temporarily authorizing a
licensed or unlicensed designee of suitable ability and judgment to temporarily
operate a cannabis establishment, or to possess, transport, or dispose of
cannabis and cannabis products, as specified by the terms of the permit. The
permit shall be printed on official Board letterhead, bear the signature of the
Chair of the Board, state clearly a means of prompt authentication by law
enforcement and licensees, and specify start and end dates and times. A
person’s eligibility for a permit under this subsection shall not be limited by
subdivision 901(d)(3) of this title.
(c) A person acting in conformity with the terms and scope of a special
permit issued pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be immune from
civil and criminal liability in relation to possession, transportation, or transfer
of cannabis within the borders of this State. The Board shall not be liable for
economic losses resulting from forfeiture, seizure, sequestration, sale stoppage,
transportation, storage, or destruction of cannabis or cannabis products.
(d) If appropriate to facilitate judicial proceedings involving a cannabis
establishment or its principals, including an action for receivership, a State
court of competent jurisdiction may request that the Board determine whether a
person is suited by background and qualifications to hold a special permit
issued pursuant to subsection (b) of this section for a purpose specified by the
court. In the alternative, the court may ask that the Board recommend such
person.
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 8 of 13
2025
Sec. 8. [Deleted.]
Sec. 9. 7 V.S.A. § 904 is amended to read:
§ 904. CULTIVATOR LICENSE
* * *
(d) Each cultivator shall create packaging for its cannabis.
(1) Packaging shall include:
(A) The name and registration number of the cultivator.
(B) The strain and variety of cannabis contained.
(C) The potency of the cannabis represented by the amount of
tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabidiol in milligrams total and per serving.
(D) A “produced on” date reflecting the date that the cultivator
finished producing the cannabis “harvested on” date reflecting the date the
cultivator harvested the cannabis and a “packed on” date reflecting the date the
product was packaged for sale.
(E) Appropriate warnings as prescribed by the Board in rule.
(F) Any additional requirements contained in rules adopted by the
Board in accordance with this chapter. Rules shall take into consideration that
different labeling requirements may be appropriate depending on whether the
cannabis is sold to a wholesaler, product manufacturer, or retailer.
(2) Packaging shall not be designed to appeal to persons under 21 years
of age.
* * *
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 9 of 13
2025
Sec. 10. 7 V.S.A. § 904b is amended to read:
§ 904b. PROPAGATION CULTIVATOR LICENSE
(a) A propagation cultivator licensed under this section may:
(1) cultivate not more than 3,500 square feet of cannabis clones,
immature cannabis plants, or mature cannabis plants;
(2) test, transport, and sell cannabis clones and immature cannabis
plants to licensed cultivators and retailers; and
(3) test, transport, and sell cannabis seeds that meet the federal
definition of hemp to a licensed cultivator or retailer or to the public.
(b) A licensed propagation cultivator shall not cultivate mature cannabis
plants for the purpose of producing, harvesting, transferring, or selling
cannabis flower for or to any person.
Sec. 11. [Deleted.]
Sec. 12. [Deleted.]
Sec. 12a. CANNABIS CONTROL BOARD REPORT; PROPOSAL FOR
FEES AND APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027
(a) On or before November 15, 2025, the Cannabis Control Board shall
submit to the House Committees on Ways and Means and on Government
Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate Committees on Finance and on
Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs a report that includes
the following information:
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 10 of 13
2025
(1) a summary of all cannabis fees in effect in fiscal year 2026,
including the amounts of revenue derived from each fee in fiscal year 2025;
(2) a projection of the fee revenues in fiscal year 2026;
(3) any available information regarding comparable fees in other
jurisdictions;
(4) any polices or trends that might affect the viability of the fee
amount; and
(5) a recommendation regarding how the cannabis establishment fee
schedule as set forth in 7 V.S.A. § 910 may be adjusted to better promote the
intent of the General Assembly to encourage participation in the regulated
cannabis market by small local farmers and social equity applicants.
(b) As part of the report required under subsection (a) of this section, the
Cannabis Control Board shall recommend whether a portion of the cannabis
excise tax established pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 7902 should be allocated to the
Cannabis Business Development Fund for uses as provided pursuant to 7
V.S.A. § 987 and the Vermont Land Access and Opportunity Board to fulfill
the duties of the Board.
Sec. 13. 32 V.S.A. § 3260 is amended to read:
§ 3260. BULK SALES
(a) Whenever a person (transferor) required to collect or withhold a trust
tax pursuant to chapter 151, 207, 225, or 233 of this title shall make any sale,
transfer, long-term lease, or assignment (transfer) in bulk of any part or the
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 11 of 13
2025
whole of the assets of a business, otherwise than in the ordinary course of the
business, the purchaser, transferee or assignee (transferee) shall, at least 10
days before taking possession of the subject of the transfer or before payment
therefore if earlier, notify the Commissioner in writing of the proposed sale
and of the price, terms, and conditions thereof whether or not the transferor has
represented to or informed the transferee that the transferor owes any trust tax
pursuant to chapter 151, 207, 225, or 233 and whether or not the transferee has
knowledge that such taxes are owed, and whether any taxes are in fact owed.
(b) Whenever the transferee shall fail to give notice to the Commissioner as
required by subsection (a) of this section, or whenever the Commissioner shall
inform the transferee that a possible claim for tax exists, any sums of money,
property, or choses in action, or other consideration, which the transferee is
required to transfer over to or for the transferor, shall be subject to a first
priority right and lien for any taxes theretofore or thereafter determined to be
due from the transferor to the State, and the transferee is forbidden to transfer
the consideration to or for the transferor to the extent of the amount of the
State’s claim.
(c) For failure to comply with this section, the transferee shall be
personally liable for the payment to the State of any taxes theretofore or
thereafter determined to be due to the State from the transferor and the liability
may be assessed and enforced in the same manner as the liability for tax under
chapter 151, 207, 225, or 233.
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 12 of 13
2025
* * *
Sec. 13a. 32 V.S.A. § 7702 is amended to read:
§ 7702. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:
* * *
(15) “Other tobacco products” means any product manufactured from,
derived from, or containing tobacco or nicotine, whether natural or synthetic,
including nicotine alkaloids and nicotine analogs, that is intended for human
consumption by smoking, chewing, or in any other manner, including products
sold as a tobacco substitute, as defined in 7 V.S.A. § 1001(8), and including
any liquids, whether nicotine based or not, or delivery devices sold separately
for use with a tobacco substitute, but shall not include cigarettes, little cigars,
roll-your-own tobacco, snuff, new smokeless tobacco as defined in this section,
or cannabis products as defined in 7 V.S.A. § 831.
* * *
(20) “New smokeless tobacco” means any tobacco product
manufactured from, derived from, or containing tobacco or nicotine, whether
natural or synthetic, including nicotine alkaloids and nicotine analogs, that is
not intended to be smoked, has a moisture content of less than 45 percent, or is
offered in individual single-dose tablets or other discrete single-use units.
* * *
VT LEG #384273 v.1

No. 56 Page 13 of 13
2025
Sec. 14. 2020 Acts and Resolves No. 164, Sec. 6d, as amended by 2023 Acts
and Resolves No. 3, Sec. 90, is further amended to read:
Sec. 6d. [Deleted.]
Sec. 15. [Deleted.]
Sec. 15a. [Deleted.]
Sec. 15b. [Deleted.]
Sec. 16. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: June 11, 2025
VT LEG #384273 v.1